Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Unauthorized Insurers False Advertising Process Act:

(1) Director shall mean the Director of Insurance; and

(2) Residents shall mean and include persons, partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations, domestic, alien, or foreign.

Laws 1965, c. 247, § 2, p. 698;

Laws 1989, LB 6, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 237.